Tennessee, session 114, SB0726.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 57-1-206(a), is amended by deleting
"the members of the general assembly" and substituting "the governor and the members of the
general assembly".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0726
002657
- 1 -